Arkansas, session 2025, SB352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 20 — Prohibition Against Antisemitism in Public Elementary and
Secondary Schools

6-16-2001. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A historic rise in antisemitic violence, harassment, and
discrimination has occurred at kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12)
schools across the United States, targeting Jewish students;
(2) In April 2024, the Director of the Federal Bureau of
*TNL098*
04-09-2025 10:51:59 TNL098

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 H4/9/25 SB352
Investigation found that the number of Federal Bureau of Investigation
investigations into antisemitic hate crimes tripled in the months after
October 7, 2023;
(3) According to a recent Gallup poll, eighty-one percent (81%)
of Americans now see antisemitism as either a "very serious" or "somewhat
serious" problem, up from fifty-seven percent (57%) two (2) decades ago;
(4) Acts of antisemitism on kindergarten through grade twelve
(K-12) school campuses undermine the educational and social fabric of our
educational institutions; and
(5) Promoting understanding, tolerance, and respect for all
students and school employees is imperative.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to require all
kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) schools to address and prohibit
antisemitic discrimination at kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12)
schools in the same manner kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) schools
would address and prohibit any other form of discrimination prohibited by
law, including without limitation discrimination on the basis of race.

6-16-2002. Definitions.
As used in this section:
(1) "Antisemitism" means the same as defined by the
International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance in its working definition of
antisemitism, including its contemporary examples, as it was adopted on May
26, 2016;
(2) "Institution of higher education" means a public two-year or
four-year institution of higher education; and
(3) "School" means a kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12):
(A) Public school or public school district; or
(B) Open-enrollment public charter school.

6-16-2003. Requirements.
(a) Each school shall treat harassment or discrimination that is
motivated by or includes antisemitic intent by a student or school employee
or is a result of school policies or programs on the school campus in the
same manner as any other form of discrimination prohibited by state or
federal law.
04-09-2025 10:51:59 TNL098

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 H4/9/25 SB352
(b) Each school district board of directors shall adopt policies that
include:
(1) The definition of antisemitism under this subchapter; and
(2) Prohibited conduct as it specifically relates to
antisemitism, which shall include:
(A) Harassment and discrimination against Jews in
compliance with Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352,
as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(B) Antidiscrimination regulations provided by the United
States Department of Education and the United States Department of Justice;
and
(C) Relevant state-level antidiscrimination laws.
(c) Each school is encouraged to:
(1) Incorporate antisemitism awareness training into any
required anti-bias training for all students, school employees, school
administrators, and school campus police; and
(2) Integrate Jewish-American heritage curriculum for students
that incorporates Jewish experiences in the United States pre- and post-
American Revolution, pre- and post-World War II and the Holocaust, and in
modern times.
(d) Each school shall place reasonable time, place, and manner
restrictions on speech to ensure order and protect the rights of all
students.

6-16-2004. Monitoring requirement.
(a)(1) The Department of Education shall designate a Title VI
Coordinator who shall monitor all complaints of discrimination and
harassment, including without limitation antisemitic discrimination and
harassment, at schools and institutions of higher education.
(2) The individual designated by the department as a Title VI
Coordinator under subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be a current
employee of the department.
(b) Each school and institution of higher education shall formally
report an incident or complaint of discrimination or harassment under this
subchapter to the Title VI Coordinator.
(c) The Title VI Coordinator established under this section shall:
04-09-2025 10:51:59 TNL098

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 H4/9/25 SB352
(1) Establish, maintain, and publicize a formal reporting
process whereby the following individuals may submit a complaint of
discrimination or harassment:
(A) All students, parents, legal guardians, and persons
standing in loco parentis to students, and school employees can submit a
complaint of discrimination or harassment;
(B) All students enrolled in an institution of higher
education; and
(C) All faculty and staff employed by an institution of
higher education.
(2)(A) Thoroughly investigate a complaint received under this
section.
(B)(i) If the Title VI Coordinator, after reasonable
investigation, determines that a school or an institution of higher education
has engaged in, allowed, or not taken the necessary action in response to
antisemitic discrimination prohibited under this antisemitic discrimination
prohibited under this subchapter or any other form of prohibited
discrimination, then the Title VI Coordinator shall provide written notice to
the school or institution of higher education to address the Title VI
Coordinator's concerns within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notice.
(ii) If the Title VI Coordinator determines that a
school or an institution of higher education has not taken the necessary
action in accordance with the notice received under subdivision (c)(2)(B)(i)
of this section within thirty (30) days, then the Title VI Coordinator shall
report its finding to the:
(a) Attorney General's office for action; and
(b) United States Department of Education and
United States Department of Justice by making a complaint under Title VI of
the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352; and
(3) By June 30 of each year issue an annual report on
discrimination in schools and institutions of higher education to the General
Assembly, which shall include without limitation the following:
(A) The number and type of discrimination-related
incidents;
(B) The category of bias-motivation, including
antisemitism; and
04-09-2025 10:51:59 TNL098

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 H4/9/25 SB352
(C) How reports of discrimination were resolved or if the
reports of discrimination are pending resolution.
(d) The General Assembly is encouraged to:
(1) Conduct hearings or investigations to assess any school or
institution of higher education that is found to inadequately address
discrimination and harassment complaints under this section; and
(2) Consider reducing or eliminating any state funding provided
to a school or state-supported institution of higher education that is found
to inadequately address discrimination and harassment complaints under this
section.

6-16-2005. Exceptions.
(a) Nothing in this act shall be construed to diminish or infringe
upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the United States
Constitution or Arkansas Constitution, Article 2, §§ 4, 6, and 24.
(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to conflict with federal or
state discrimination laws.
(c) Criticism of Israel similar to the criticism leveled against any
other country shall not be regarded as antisemitic.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 60, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 16 — Prohibition Against Antisemitism in Institutions of Higher
Education

6-60-1601. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A historic rise in antisemitic violence, harassment, and
discrimination has occurred at institutions of higher education across the
United States, targeting Jewish students;
(2) In April 2024, the Director of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation found that the number of Federal Bureau of Investigation
investigations into antisemitic hate crimes tripled in the months after
October 7, 2023;
(3) According to a recent Gallup poll, eighty-one percent (81%)
of Americans now see antisemitism as either a "very serious" or "somewhat
04-09-2025 10:51:59 TNL098

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 H4/9/25 SB352
serious" problem, up from fifty-seven percent (57%) two (2) decades ago;
(4) Acts of antisemitism on institution of higher education
campuses undermine the educational and social fabric of our educational
institutions; and
(5) Promoting understanding, tolerance, and respect for all
students and institution of higher education employees is imperative.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to require all
institutions of higher education to address and prohibit antisemitic
discrimination at institution of higher education campuses in the same manner
as institutions of higher education would address and prohibit any other form
of discrimination prohibited by law, including without limitation
discrimination on the basis of race.

6-60-1602. Definitions.
As used in this section:
(1) "Antisemitism" means the same as defined by the
International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance in its working definition of
antisemitism, including its contemporary examples, as it was adopted on May
26, 2016; and
(2) "Institution of higher education" means a public two-year or
four-year institution of higher education.

6-60-1603. Requirements.
(a) Each institution of higher education shall treat harassment or
discrimination that is motivated by or includes antisemitic intent by a
student enrolled in the institution of higher education or an individual
employed by the institution of higher education or that is a result of
institution of higher education policies or programs on the institution of
higher education campus in the same manner as any other form of
discrimination prohibited by state or federal law.
(b) Each institution of higher education shall incorporate into its
student and employee codes of conduct:
(1) The definition of antisemitism under this subchapter; and
(2) Prohibited conduct as it specifically relates to
antisemitism, which shall include:
(A) Harassment and discrimination against Jews in
04-09-2025 10:51:59 TNL098

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 H4/9/25 SB352
compliance with Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352,
as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(B) Antidiscrimination regulations provided by the United
States Department of Education and the United States Department of Justice;
and
(C) Relevant state-level antidiscrimination laws.
(c) Each institution of higher education is encouraged to:
(1) Incorporate antisemitism awareness training into any
required anti-bias training for all students enrolled in the institution of
higher education and individuals employed by the institution of higher
education; and
(2) Integrate Jewish-American heritage curriculum for students
enrolled in the institution of higher education that incorporates Jewish
experiences in the United States pre- and post-American Revolution, pre- and
post-World War II and the Holocaust, and in modern times.
(d) Each institution of higher education shall place reasonable time,
place, and manner restrictions on speech to ensure order and protect the
rights of all students enrolled in the institution of higher education.

6-60-1604. Monitoring.
Each institution of higher education shall comply with monitoring and
reporting requirements under § 6-16-2004.

6-60-1605. Exceptions.
(a) Nothing in this act shall be construed to diminish or infringe
upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the United States
Constitution or Arkansas Constitution, Article 2, §§ 4, 6, and 24.
(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to conflict with federal or
state discrimination laws.
(c) Criticism of Israel similar to the criticism leveled against any
other country shall not be regarded as antisemitic.

/s/Stone



04-09-2025 10:51:59 TNL098